Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. Superintendent Of Public Instruction And Department Of Education
“(b) Based upon these findings, the Wyoming teacher accountability act places emphasis on a teacher performance evaluation system based upon student achievement for use by school district boards of trustees in determining teacher contract performance and status. The basis for the performance evaluation system shall be built upon the educational accountability system and the assessments and measures within the accountability system identified by law to measure student achievement and the effectiveness of classroom teachers in improving student achievement.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2011, ch. 182, § 5, provides:

“Prior to November 1, 2011, the joint appropriations interim committee shall review the fiscal impact of this act upon the office of administrative hearings and develop necessary recommendations to the legislature for funding the requirements of this act in establishing the 2013-2014 biennial budget for this office. Not later than September 1, 2011, the office of administrative hearings shall report to the committee on its analysis of the placement of teacher dismissal, suspension and termination hearings under this office, and evaluate the placement of this function as a responsibility for this office.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 184, § 8, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2011.

Laws 2019, ch. 109 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).